Indiana, session 2026, HB1050.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-28-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 16. Prohibition Against Lien on Principal Residence of
a Consumer for Health Care Debt
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "consumer" means an
individual whose principal residence is in Indiana.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(2) A representative acting on behalf of a protected consumer
(as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "health care debt" means an
obligation or an alleged obligation of a consumer to pay an amount
related to the receipt of health care services, products, or devices
provided to a person by a health care provider.
(b) The term does not include debt charged to a credit card
unless the credit card is issued under:
2026 IN 1050—LS 6180/DI 154


(1) an open-end plan; or
(2) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" means:
(1) a person listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(1) through
IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(2) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of a
person described in subdivision (1) or (2).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "principal residence", with
respect to a consumer, means real or personal property that:
(1) is located in Indiana;
(2) the consumer:
(A) owns; or
(B) is buying under contract;
whether solely or jointly with another person; and
(3) constitutes the principal place of residence of:
(A) the consumer; or
(B) a dependent of the consumer.
Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law:
(1) any amount of health care debt owed or alleged to be owed
by a consumer; or
(2) in an action against a consumer in which a judgment has
been entered, any amount of the judgment that represents
health care debt determined to be owed by the consumer;
does not constitute a lien against the consumer's principal
residence.
(b) A person having any ownership or other interest in an
amount described in subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) may not assert,
claim, enter, or enforce a lien against the consumer's principal
residence.
SECTION 2. IC 34-25-1-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.5. (a) As used in this section, "consumer"
means an individual whose principal residence is in Indiana. The
term includes the following:
(1) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(2) A representative acting on behalf of a protected consumer
(as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(b) As used in this section, "health care debt" means an
2026 IN 1050—LS 6180/DI 154


obligation or an alleged obligation of a consumer to pay an amount
related to the receipt of health care services, products, or devices
provided to a person by a health care provider. The term does not
include debt charged to a credit card unless the credit card is
issued under:
(1) an open-end plan; or
(2) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.
(c) As used in this section, "health care provider" means:
(1) a person listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(1) through
IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(2) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of a
person described in subdivision (1) or (2).
(d) As used in this section, "principal residence", with respect
to a consumer, means real or personal property that:
(1) is located in Indiana;
(2) the consumer:
(A) owns; or
(B) is buying under contract;
whether solely or jointly with another person; and
(3) constitutes the principal place of residence of:
(A) the consumer; or
(B) a dependent of the consumer.
(e) In any action filed, in a court of competent jurisdiction in
Indiana, for the recovery of health care debt owed or alleged to be
owed by a consumer, the court does not have and shall not
entertain jurisdiction in any action of attachment under IC 34-25-2
against the principal residence of the consumer upon, or any time
after, the filing of the complaint in the action for the recovery of
health care debt owed or alleged to be owed by the consumer.
SECTION 3. IC 34-55-9-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Consumer" means an individual whose principal
residence is in Indiana. The term includes the following:
(A) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(B) A representative acting on behalf of a protected
consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
2026 IN 1050—LS 6180/DI 154


(2) "Health care debt" means an obligation or an alleged
obligation of a consumer to pay an amount related to the
receipt of health care services, products, or devices provided
to a person by a health care provider. The term does not
include debt charged to a credit card unless the credit card is
issued under:
(A) an open-end plan; or
(B) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.
(3) "Health care provider" means:
(A) a person listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(1) through
IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(B) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of
a person described in clause (A) or (B).
(4) "Principal residence", with respect to a consumer, means
real or personal property that:
(A) is located in Indiana;
(B) the consumer:
(i) owns; or
(ii) is buying under contract;
whether solely or jointly with another person; and
(C) constitutes the principal place of residence of:
(i) the consumer; or
(ii) a dependent of the consumer.
SECTION 4. IC 34-55-9-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), the following real estate is liable to all
judgments and attachments and to be sold on execution against the
debtor owing owning the real estate or for whose use the real estate is
held:
(1) All lands of the judgment debtor, whether in possession,
remainder, or reversion.
(2) All rights of redeeming mortgaged lands and all lands held by
virtue of any land office certificate.
(3) Lands or any estate or interest in land held by anyone in trust
for or to the use of another.
(4) All chattels real of the judgment debtor.
(b) In any action filed, in a court of competent jurisdiction in
Indiana, for the recovery of health care debt owed or alleged to be
2026 IN 1050—LS 6180/DI 154


owed by a consumer, the principal residence of the consumer is not
liable to judgment or attachment or to be sold on execution against
the consumer.
SECTION 5. IC 34-55-9-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), all final judgments for the recovery of
money or costs in the circuit court and other courts of record of general
original jurisdiction in Indiana, whether state or federal, constitute a
lien upon real estate and chattels real liable to execution in the county
where the judgment has been duly entered and indexed in the judgment
docket as provided by law:
(1) after the time the judgment was entered and indexed; and
(2) until the expiration of ten (10) years after the rendition of the
judgment;
exclusive of any time during which the party was restrained from
proceeding on the lien by an appeal, an injunction, the death of the
defendant, or the agreement of the parties entered of record.
(b) A final judgment for the recovery of money or costs in any
action filed, in a court of competent jurisdiction in Indiana, for the
recovery of health care debt owed or alleged to be owed by a
consumer does not constitute a lien upon the principal residence of
the consumer.
SECTION 6. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1050—LS 6180/DI 154